Utah statutes.
61-6-6.   Optional exemption from this chapter.

A corporation's articles of incorporation or bylaws may provide that this chapter does not apply to control share acquisitions of shares of the corporation.  To be effective, any such provision must have been adopted prior to the control share acquisition.  Absent such a provision, control shares of an issuing public corporation acquired in a control share acquisition have only such voting rights as are conferred by Section 61-6-10.



Enacted by Chapter 2, 1987 Special Session 1

